Vermont statutes. Title 15A Adoption Act
Subchapter 1. Placement of Minors for Adoption

§ 2-101.
Who may place minors for adoption.

The only persons who may place a minor for adoption are:

a parent having legal and physical custody of the minor, as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section;

a guardian expressly authorized by the court to place the minor for adoption;

an agency to which the minor has been relinquished for purposes of adoption; or

an agency expressly authorized to place the minor for adoption by a court order terminating the relationship between the minor and the minor’s parent or guardian.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a parent having legal and physical custody of a minor may place the minor for adoption, even if the other parent has not executed a consent or a relinquishment or the other parent’s relationship to the minor has not been terminated.

A parent having legal and physical custody of a minor may not place the minor for adoption if the other parent has legal custody or a right of visitation with the minor and that parent’s whereabouts are known, unless that parent agrees in writing to the placement or, before the placement, the parent who intends to place the minor sends notice of the intended placement by certified mail to the other parent’s last known address.

An agency authorized under this title to place a minor for adoption may place the minor for adoption, even if only one parent has executed a relinquishment or has had his or her parental relationship to the minor terminated.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-102.
Direct placement for adoption by parent or guardian.

A parent or guardian authorized to place a minor for adoption may place the minor only with a prospective adoptive parent who has a valid favorable preplacement evaluation or for whom a preplacement evaluation is not required.

A parent or guardian shall personally select a prospective adoptive parent.

A parent or guardian may be assisted by another person in locating a prospective adoptive parent or in transferring legal and physical custody to a prospective adoptive parent.

A prospective adoptive parent may be assisted by another person in locating a minor who is available for adoption.

A prospective adoptive parent shall furnish a copy of the preplacement evaluation to the parent or guardian. The evaluation may be edited to exclude identifying information.

If, at the time of the minor’s placement for adoption, the parent or guardian has not executed a consent to adoption, the parent or guardian will furnish to the prospective adoptive parent a signed statement that:

the transfer of custody is for the purpose of adoption;

the parent or guardian has been informed of the provisions of this title relevant to placement for adoption, consent, and termination of parental rights;

the prospective adoptive parent is authorized to provide support and medical care for a specific period of time.

The prospective adoptive parent shall acknowledge in writing responsibility for the minor’s medical and other care and support and for returning the minor to the custody of the parent or guardian if the consent is not executed within the time specified.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-103.
Placement for adoption by agency.

An agency authorized to place a minor for adoption shall furnish to a person who inquires about its services a written statement of its services, including the agency’s procedure for selecting a prospective adoptive parent for a minor, the role of the parent or guardian in the selection, and a schedule of its fees.

A parent shall be informed that he or she may indicate preferences for the selection of the adoptive parent, and may be involved in the selection of the adoptive parent.

An agency that places a minor for adoption shall authorize in writing the prospective adoptive parent to provide support and medical and other care for the minor pending entry of a decree of adoption. The prospective adoptive parent shall acknowledge in writing responsibility for the minor’s support and medical and other care.

An agency shall inform the adoptive parents about any known unique requirements or special needs of the child and the services available to assist with meeting those needs, including any adoption subsidy for which the child may be eligible.

Upon request by a parent who has relinquished a minor child pursuant to Part 4 of this article, the agency shall promptly inform the parent as to whether the minor has been placed for adoption, whether a petition for adoption has been granted, denied, or withdrawn, and, if the petition was not granted, whether another placement has been made.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-104.
[Reserved.]

§ 2-105.
Disclosure of information on background.

Before placing a minor for adoption, a parent or agency placing the minor shall provide in writing to the prospective adoptive parent all of the following nonidentifying information that is reasonably available from the parents, relatives, or guardian of the minor; the agency; any person who has had physical custody of the minor for 30 days or more; or any person who has provided health, psychological, educational, or similar services to the minor:

a social and health history of the minor, including:

date, time, and place of birth;

first and middle name as given by the parent;

current health history, including an account of the minor’s prenatal care, medical condition at birth, any drug or medication taken by the minor’s mother during pregnancy;

any subsequent medical, psychological, psychiatric, and dental information and diagnosis, and a record of any immunizations and health care received while in foster or other care;

any physical, sexual, or emotional abuse known to have been experienced by the minor;

enrollment and performance in school, results of educational testing, and any special educational needs; and

an account of the minor’s past and existing relationship with any relative, foster parent, or other person with whom the minor has lived or visited on a regular basis;

a social and health history of the minor’s parents and extended family, including:

health and genetic history, including any known hereditary condition or disease, the current health of each parent, a summary of the findings of any medical, psychological, or psychiatric evaluation of each parent completed prior to placement, history of use of drugs and alcohol, and if a parent is deceased, the cause of and the age at death;

racial, ethnic, and religious background, and general physical description;

the levels and types of educational, vocational, athletic, artistic, or scientific achievement or interests, including academic performance and diagnosed learning problems;

the date of birth and sex of any other child of the parents and whether or not those children have been removed from the parent’s custody or placed for adoption;

the facts and circumstances related to the consent or relinquishment or termination of parental rights; and

any information necessary to determine the minor’s eligibility for State or federal benefits, including financial, medical, or other assistance.

Before the final hearing on a petition for adoption, a person or agency who placed a minor for adoption shall provide to the prospective adoptive parent a supplemental written report containing any information listed in subsection (a) of this section which was unavailable before the minor was placed, but becomes reasonably available after the placement.

The Department shall prescribe forms designed to obtain specific information about the minor and the minor’s family and shall provide these forms to any agency, attorney, or certified placement intermediary.

A report furnished under this section shall indicate who prepared the report and, unless confidentiality has been waived, shall be edited by the person who prepared the report to exclude the identity of any person who furnished information or about whom information is reported.

The adoptive parents shall file a copy of the report furnished under this section in the Probate Division of the Superior Court when the petition for adoption is filed. Upon finalization of an adoption, the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall file a copy of the report with the adoption registry.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 73.

§ 2-106.
Interstate placement.

An adoption in this State of a minor brought into this State from another state by a prospective adoptive parent, or by a person who places the minor for adoption in this State, is governed by the laws of this State, including this title and the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-107.
Intercountry placement.

An adoption in this State of a minor brought into this State from another country by a prospective adoptive parent, or by a person who places the minor for adoption in this State, is governed by this title, subject to any convention or treaty on intercountry adoption which the United States has ratified, and any relevant federal law.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.